Massachusetts, session 194th, H249.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of chapter 18 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition, is
hereby amended in subsection (e) by inserting, in line 43, after the word “correctional” the
following:- “, financial literacy”.
of 1